Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.480

Uniformed personnel—Refusal to submit to procedures—Invoking jurisdiction of superior court—Contempt.

If the representative of either or both the uniformed personnel and the public employer refuse to submit to the procedures set forth in RCW 41.56.440 and 41.56.450, the parties, or the commission on its own motion, may invoke the jurisdiction of the superior court for the county in which the labor dispute exists and such court shall have jurisdiction to issue an appropriate order. A failure to obey such order may be punished by the court as a contempt thereof. A decision of the arbitration panel shall be final and binding on the parties, and may be enforced at the instance of either party, the arbitration panel or the commission in the superior court for the county where the dispute arose.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 296 s 30; 1973 c 131 s 7.]

NOTES:

Construction—1973 c 131: See RCW 41.56.905.